dictsource/ru_rules
.group ф
        ф       f
        ф (Y    f;
        ф (б    v
        ф (б'   v;
        ф (гY   v
        ф (г    v
        ф (дB   v
        ф (дY   v
        ф (д    v
        ф (ж    v
        ф (зY   v
        ф (з    v
        ф (мY   f;
        ф (пY   f;
        ф (пмY  f;
        ф (пфY  f;
        ф (фY   f;

.group х
        х       x
        х (Y    x     //С
        х (бY   x
        х (б    x
        х (бвY  x
        х (бмY  x
        х (_бы  x
        х (гY   x
        х (г    x
        х (дB   x
        х (дY   x
        х (д    x
        х (ж    x
        х (зY   x
        х (з    x
        х (кY   x    //С

.group ц
        ц       ts
        ц (б    dz
        ц (бY   dz
        ц (бвY  dz
        ц (бмY  dz
        ц (г    dz
        ц (гY   dz
        ц (дB   dz
        ц (д    dz
        ц (дY   dz
        ц (ж    dz
        ц (з    dz
        ц (зY   dz

.group ч
        ч       tS;
   лу) ч (ш    t
        ч (б    dZ;
        ч (бY   dZ;
        ч (бвY  dZ;
        ч (бмY  dZ;
        ч (г    dZ;
        ч (гY   dZ;
        ч (дB   dZ;
        ч (д    dZ;
        ч (дY   dZ;
        ч (ж    dZ;
        ч (з    dZ;
        ч (зY   dZ;
  деви) ч (н    S
  _коне) ч (но_   S
 пустя) ч (н    S
 скворе)ч (н    S
   ску) ч (н    S
         _ни) ч (то_             S
       наро) ч (но               S
        никити) ч (н    S
        ильини) ч (н    S
          подсве) ч (н               S
        савви) ч (н    S
                    _) ч (то   S
    яи) ч (ни   S

.group ш
        ш       S
        ш (бY   Z
        ш (б    Z
        ш (бвY  Z
        ш (бмY  Z
        ш (гY   Z
        ш (г    Z
        ш (дB   Z
        ш (дY   Z
        ш (д    Z
        ш (ж    Z
        ш (зY   Z
        ш (з    Z

.group щ
        щ       S;
?2      щ       SS
        щ (бY   Z;
        щ (б    Z;
        щ (бвY  Z;
        щ (бмY  Z;
        щ (гY   Z;
        щ (г    Z;
        щ (дB   Z;
        щ (дY   Z;
        щ (д    Z;
        щ (ж    Z;
        щ (зY   Z;
        щ (з    Z;
          помо) щ (ник             S
.group ъ
        ъ (Y    j
?2      ъ (Y    _|

.group ы
        ы       y
        ы (́   'y   

.group ь
        ь (Y    j
?2      ь (Y    _|

.group э
        э       E2
     _) э       E#
        э (_    E#
        э (́   'E2   

.group ю
        ю       u"
     A) ю       ju
     ъ) ю       ju
     ь) ю       ju
     _) ю       ju
        _) ю ((́   'ju   
        A) ю ((́   'ju   
        C) ю ((́   'u"   
        A(́) ю   ju   
      ъ) ю(́     'ju
       ь) ю(́    'ju

.group я
        я       V       // TODO: in unstressed position it sometimes sounds more like [i] than like [V]
     A) я       ja
     A) я (_    ja      //second position
     ъ) я       ja
     ъ) я (_    ja      //second position
     ь) я       ja
     ь) я (_    ja      //second position
     _) я       ja      //second position
        я (_    V
        _) я ((́   'ja   
        A) я ((́   'ja   
        C) я ((́   'V   
        A(́) я   ja   
        A(́) я (_   ja   
        ъ) я(́     'ja
        ъ) я ((́_     'ja
       ь)   я(́    'ja

.group ё
        ё      '8
   A) ё       'j8
?2   A) ё       'j8
     _) ё       'j8
     ж) ё       'O
     ш) ё       'O
        _) ё ((́   'j8   
        A) ё ((́   'j8   
        C) ё ((́   '8   
        A(́) ё   j8   
        A(́) ё (_   j8   

.group
        // other cyrillic letters
        ѓ       dZ;
        ґ       g
        ђ       dZ;
        є       jE
        і       i
        ї       ji
        ј       j   // U+458
        ќ       kj
        љ       lj
        ћ       tS;
        ў       w
        џ       dZ
